static/hunspell/15.12.2023/bash.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY -абвгғдҙеёжзийкҡлмнңоөпрсҫтуүфхһцчшщъыьэәюяАБВГҒДҘЕЁЖЗИЙКҠЛМНҢОӨПРСҪТУҮФХҺЦЧШЩЪЫЬЭӘЮЯ

REP 0

FLAG long

WORDCHARS -

SFX A01 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A01 0 ыраҡ .	+Comp

SFX A02 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A02 0 ерәк .	+Comp

SFX A03 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A03 0 ораҡ .	+Comp

SFX A04 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A04 0 өрәк .	+Comp

SFX A05 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A05 0 ыраҡ .	+Comp

SFX A06 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A06 0 ерәк .	+Comp

SFX A07 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A07 0 ораҡ .	+Comp

SFX A08 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A08 0 өрәк .	+Comp

SFX A09 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A09 0 раҡ .	+Comp

SFX A10 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A10 0 рәк .	+Comp

SFX A11 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A11 0 раҡ .	+Comp

SFX A12 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A12 0 рәк .	+Comp

SFX A13 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A13 0 ыраҡ .	+Comp

SFX A14 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A14 0 ерәк .	+Comp

SFX A15 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A15 0 ораҡ .	+Comp

SFX A16 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A16 0 өрәк .	+Comp

SFX B01 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B01 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B02 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B02 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B03 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B03 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B04 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B04 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B05 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B05 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B06 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B06 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B07 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B07 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B08 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B08 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B09 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B09 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B10 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B10 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B11 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B11 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B12 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B12 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B13 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B13 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B14 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B14 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B15 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B15 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B16 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B16 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX C01 Y 1 # Conj союз
SFX C01 0 0 .	[Conj]

SFX D01 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D01 0 ыраҡ .	+Comp

SFX D02 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D02 0 ерәк .	+Comp

SFX D03 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D03 0 ораҡ .	+Comp

SFX D04 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D04 0 өрәк .	+Comp

SFX D05 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D05 0 ыраҡ .	+Comp

SFX D06 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D06 0 ерәк .	+Comp

SFX D07 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D07 0 ораҡ .	+Comp

SFX D08 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D08 0 өрәк .	+Comp

SFX D09 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D09 0 раҡ .	+Comp

SFX D10 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D10 0 рәк .	+Comp

SFX D11 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D11 0 раҡ .	+Comp

SFX D12 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D12 0 рәк .	+Comp

SFX D13 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D13 0 ыраҡ .	+Comp

SFX D14 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D14 0 ерәк .	+Comp

SFX D15 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D15 0 ораҡ .	+Comp

SFX D16 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D16 0 өрәк .	+Comp

SFX F1 Y 162 # фамилия N05
SFX F1 0 а ов	+Sg+Nom
SFX F1 0 алар/O01 ов	+Pl
SFX F1 0 аның/O03 ов	+Gen
SFX F1 0 аға/O07 ов	+Dat
SFX F1 0 аны/O07 ов	+Acc
SFX F1 0 анан/O03 ов	+Abl
SFX F1 0 ала/O07 ов	+Loc
SFX F1 0 амын/O12 ов	+Pred1Sg
SFX F1 0 аһың/O12 ов	+Pred2Sg
SFX F1 0 абыҙ/O16 ов	+Pred1Pl
SFX F1 0 аһығыҙ/O16 ов	+Pred2Pl
SFX F1 0 ам/O21 ов	+PxSg1
SFX F1 0 аң/O21 ов	+PxSg2
SFX F1 0 аһы/O29 ов	+PxSg3
SFX F1 0 абыҙ/O25 ов	+PxPl1
SFX F1 0 ағыҙ/O25 ов	+PxPl2
SFX F1 0 амы/O33 ов	+Q
SFX F1 0 алыр ов	+Indf
SFX F1 0 асы ов	+Clt/сы
SFX F1 0 аныҡы/O38 ов	+Poss
SFX F1 0 аҡай/O42 ов	+Dim
SFX F1 0 алай/O44 ов	+Der/дай
SFX F1 0 аса/O46 ов	+Der/са
SFX F1 0 алағы/O48 ов	+Der/дағы
SFX F1 0 алы/O50 ов	+Der/лы
SFX F1 0 аһыҙ/O54 ов	+Abe
SFX F1 0 ағаса/O58 ов	+Der/ҡаса
SFX F1 0 а ёв	+Sg+Nom
SFX F1 0 алар/O01 ёв	+Pl
SFX F1 0 аның/O03 ёв	+Gen
SFX F1 0 аға/O07 ёв	+Dat
SFX F1 0 аны/O07 ёв	+Acc
SFX F1 0 анан/O03 ёв	+Abl
SFX F1 0 ала/O07 ёв	+Loc
SFX F1 0 амын/O12 ёв	+Pred1Sg
SFX F1 0 аһың/O12 ёв	+Pred2Sg
SFX F1 0 абыҙ/O16 ёв	+Pred1Pl
SFX F1 0 аһығыҙ/O16 ёв	+Pred2Pl
SFX F1 0 ам/O21 ёв	+PxSg1
SFX F1 0 аң/O21 ёв	+PxSg2
SFX F1 0 аһы/O29 ёв	+PxSg3
SFX F1 0 абыҙ/O25 ёв	+PxPl1
SFX F1 0 ағыҙ/O25 ёв	+PxPl2
SFX F1 0 амы/O33 ёв	+Q
SFX F1 0 алыр ёв	+Indf
SFX F1 0 асы ёв	+Clt/сы
SFX F1 0 аныҡы/O38 ёв	+Poss
SFX F1 0 аҡай/O42 ёв	+Dim
SFX F1 0 алай/O44 ёв	+Der/дай
SFX F1 0 аса/O46 ёв	+Der/са
SFX F1 0 алағы/O48 ёв	+Der/дағы
SFX F1 0 алы/O50 ёв	+Der/лы
SFX F1 0 аһыҙ/O54 ёв	+Abe
SFX F1 0 ағаса/O58 ёв	+Der/ҡаса
SFX F1 0 а ын	+Sg+Nom
SFX F1 0 алар/O01 ын	+Pl
SFX F1 0 аның/O03 ын	+Gen
SFX F1 0 аға/O07 ын	+Dat
SFX F1 0 аны/O07 ын	+Acc
SFX F1 0 анан/O03 ын	+Abl
SFX F1 0 ала/O07 ын	+Loc
SFX F1 0 амын/O12 ын	+Pred1Sg
SFX F1 0 аһың/O12 ын	+Pred2Sg
SFX F1 0 абыҙ/O16 ын	+Pred1Pl
SFX F1 0 аһығыҙ/O16 ын	+Pred2Pl
SFX F1 0 ам/O21 ын	+PxSg1
SFX F1 0 аң/O21 ын	+PxSg2
SFX F1 0 аһы/O29 ын	+PxSg3
SFX F1 0 абыҙ/O25 ын	+PxPl1
SFX F1 0 ағыҙ/O25 ын	+PxPl2
SFX F1 0 амы/O33 ын	+Q
SFX F1 0 алыр ын	+Indf
SFX F1 0 асы ын	+Clt/сы
SFX F1 0 аныҡы/O38 ын	+Poss
SFX F1 0 аҡай/O42 ын	+Dim
SFX F1 0 алай/O44 ын	+Der/дай
SFX F1 0 аса/O46 ын	+Der/са
SFX F1 0 алағы/O48 ын	+Der/дағы
SFX F1 0 алы/O50 ын	+Der/лы
SFX F1 0 аһыҙ/O54 ын	+Abe
SFX F1 0 ағаса/O58 ын	+Der/ҡаса
SFX F1 0 а ев	+Sg+Nom
SFX F1 0 алар/O01 ев	+Pl
SFX F1 0 аның/O03 ев	+Gen
SFX F1 0 аға/O07 ев	+Dat
SFX F1 0 аны/O07 ев	+Acc
SFX F1 0 анан/O03 ев	+Abl
SFX F1 0 ала/O07 ев	+Loc
SFX F1 0 амын/O12 ев	+Pred1Sg
SFX F1 0 аһың/O12 ев	+Pred2Sg
SFX F1 0 абыҙ/O16 ев	+Pred1Pl
SFX F1 0 аһығыҙ/O16 ев	+Pred2Pl
SFX F1 0 ам/O21 ев	+PxSg1
SFX F1 0 аң/O21 ев	+PxSg2
SFX F1 0 аһы/O29 ев	+PxSg3
SFX F1 0 абыҙ/O25 ев	+PxPl1
SFX F1 0 ағыҙ/O25 ев	+PxPl2
SFX F1 0 амы/O33 ев	+Q
SFX F1 0 алыр ев	+Indf
SFX F1 0 асы ев	+Clt/сы
SFX F1 0 аныҡы/O38 ев	+Poss
SFX F1 0 аҡай/O42 ев	+Dim
SFX F1 0 алай/O44 ев	+Der/дай
SFX F1 0 аса/O46 ев	+Der/са
SFX F1 0 алағы/O48 ев	+Der/дағы
SFX F1 0 алы/O50 ев	+Der/лы
SFX F1 0 аһыҙ/O54 ев	+Abe
SFX F1 0 ағаса/O58 ев	+Der/ҡаса
SFX F1 0 а ин	+Sg+Nom
SFX F1 0 алар/O01 ин	+Pl
SFX F1 0 аның/O03 ин	+Gen
SFX F1 0 аға/O07 ин	+Dat
SFX F1 0 аны/O07 ин	+Acc
SFX F1 0 анан/O03 ин	+Abl
SFX F1 0 ала/O07 ин	+Loc
SFX F1 0 амын/O12 ин	+Pred1Sg
SFX F1 0 аһың/O12 ин	+Pred2Sg
SFX F1 0 абыҙ/O16 ин	+Pred1Pl
SFX F1 0 аһығыҙ/O16 ин	+Pred2Pl
SFX F1 0 ам/O21 ин	+PxSg1
SFX F1 0 аң/O21 ин	+PxSg2
SFX F1 0 аһы/O29 ин	+PxSg3
SFX F1 0 абыҙ/O25 ин	+PxPl1
SFX F1 0 ағыҙ/O25 ин	+PxPl2
SFX F1 0 амы/O33 ин	+Q
SFX F1 0 алыр ин	+Indf
SFX F1 0 асы ин	+Clt/сы
SFX F1 0 аныҡы/O38 ин	+Poss
SFX F1 0 аҡай/O42 ин	+Dim
SFX F1 0 алай/O44 ин	+Der/дай
SFX F1 0 аса/O46 ин	+Der/са
SFX F1 0 алағы/O48 ин	+Der/дағы
SFX F1 0 алы/O50 ин	+Der/лы
SFX F1 0 аһыҙ/O54 ин	+Abe
SFX F1 0 ағаса/O58 ин	+Der/ҡаса
SFX F1 ий ая ский	+Sg+Nom
SFX F1 ий аялар/O01 ский	+Pl
SFX F1 ий аяның/O03 ский	+Gen
SFX F1 ий аяға/O07 ский	+Dat
SFX F1 ий аяны/O07 ский	+Acc
SFX F1 ий аянан/O03 ский	+Abl
SFX F1 ий аяла/O07 ский	+Loc
SFX F1 ий аямын/O12 ский	+Pred1Sg
SFX F1 ий аяһың/O12 ский	+Pred2Sg
SFX F1 ий аябыҙ/O16 ский	+Pred1Pl
SFX F1 ий аяһығыҙ/O16 ский	+Pred2Pl
SFX F1 ий аям/O21 ский	+PxSg1
SFX F1 ий аяң/O21 ский	+PxSg2
SFX F1 ий аяһы/O29 ский	+PxSg3
SFX F1 ий аябыҙ/O25 ский	+PxPl1
SFX F1 ий аяғыҙ/O25 ский	+PxPl2
SFX F1 ий аямы/O33 ский	+Q
SFX F1 ий аялыр ский	+Indf
SFX F1 ий аясы ский	+Clt/сы
SFX F1 ий аяныҡы/O38 ский	+Poss
SFX F1 ий аяҡай/O42 ский	+Dim
SFX F1 ий аялай/O44 ский	+Der/дай
SFX F1 ий аяса/O46 ский	+Der/са
SFX F1 ий аялағы/O48 ский	+Der/дағы
SFX F1 ий аялы/O50 ский	+Der/лы
SFX F1 ий аяһыҙ/O54 ский	+Abe
SFX F1 ий аяғаса/O58 ский	+Der/ҡаса

SFX F2 Y 1 # имя
SFX F2 0 0 .

SFX F3 Y 1 # имя (man_names.txt)
SFX F3 0 0 .

SFX F4 Y 1 # имя (woman-names.txt)
SFX F4 0 0 .

SFX F5 Y 27 # отчество N05
SFX F5 ич на вич	+Sg+Nom
SFX F5 ич налар/O01 вич	+Pl
SFX F5 ич наның/O03 ский	+Gen
SFX F5 ич наға/O07 ский	+Dat
SFX F5 ич наны/O07 ский	+Acc
SFX F5 ич нанан/O03 ский	+Abl
SFX F5 ич нала/O07 ский	+Loc
SFX F5 ич намын/O12 ский	+Pred1Sg
SFX F5 ич наһың/O12 ский	+Pred2Sg
SFX F5 ич набыҙ/O16 ский	+Pred1Pl
SFX F5 ич наһығыҙ/O16 ский	+Pred2Pl
SFX F5 ич нам/O21 ский	+PxSg1
SFX F5 ич наң/O21 ский	+PxSg2
SFX F5 ич наһы/O29 ский	+PxSg3
SFX F5 ич набыҙ/O25 ский	+PxPl1
SFX F5 ич нағыҙ/O25 ский	+PxPl2
SFX F5 ич намы/O33 ский	+Q
SFX F5 ич налыр ский	+Indf
SFX F5 ич насы ский	+Clt/сы
SFX F5 ич наныҡы/O38 ский	+Poss
SFX F5 ич наҡай/O42 ский	+Dim
SFX F5 ич налай/O44 ский	+Der/дай
SFX F5 ич наса/O46 ский	+Der/са
SFX F5 ич налағы/O48 ский	+Der/дағы
SFX F5 ич налы/O50 ский	+Der/лы
SFX F5 ич наһыҙ/O54 ский	+Abe
SFX F5 ич нағаса/O58 ский	+Der/ҡаса

SFX F6 Y 1 # отчество неправильное
SFX F6 0 0 .

SFX I01 Y 1 # междометия Interj
SFX I01 0 0 .	[Interj]

SFX L01 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L01 0 0 .

SFX L02 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L02 0 0 .

SFX L03 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L03 0 0 .

SFX L04 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L04 0 0 .

SFX L05 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L05 0 0 .

SFX L06 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L06 0 0 .

SFX L07 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L07 0 0 .

SFX L08 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L08 0 0 .

SFX L09 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L09 0 0 .

SFX L10 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L10 0 0 .

SFX L11 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L11 0 0 .

SFX L12 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L12 0 0 .

SFX L13 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L13 0 0 .

SFX L14 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L14 0 0 .

SFX L15 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L15 0 0 .

SFX L16 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L16 0 0 .

SFX M01 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M01 0 0 .

SFX M02 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M02 0 0 .

SFX M03 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M03 0 0 .

SFX M04 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M04 0 0 .

SFX M05 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M05 0 0 .

SFX M06 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M06 0 0 .

SFX M07 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M07 0 0 .

SFX M08 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M08 0 0 .

SFX M09 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M09 0 0 .

SFX M10 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M10 0 0 .

SFX M11 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M11 0 0 .

SFX M12 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M12 0 0 .

SFX M13 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M13 0 0 .

SFX M14 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M14 0 0 .

SFX M15 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M15 0 0 .

SFX M16 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M16 0 0 .

SFX N01 Y 52 # существительные Noun
SFX N01 0 дар/O01 [^ь]	+Pl
SFX N01 ь дар/O01 [ь]	+Pl
SFX N01 0 дың/O03 [^ь]	+Gen
SFX N01 ь дың/O03 [ь]	+Gen
SFX N01 0 ға/O07 [^ь]	+Dat
SFX N01 ь ға/O07 [ь]	+Dat
SFX N01 0 ды/O07 [^ь]	+Acc
SFX N01 ь ды/O07 [ь]	+Acc
SFX N01 0 дан/O03 [^ь]	+Abl
SFX N01 ь дан/O03 [ь]	+Abl
SFX N01 0 да/O07 [^ь]	+Loc
SFX N01 ь да/O07 [ь]	+Loc
SFX N01 0 мын/O12 [^ь]	+Pred1Sg
SFX N01 ь мын/O12 [ь]	+Pred1Sg
SFX N01 0 һың/O12 [^ь]	+Pred2Sg
SFX N01 ь һың/O12 [ь]	+Pred2Sg
SFX N01 0 быҙ/O16 [^ь]	+Pred1Pl
SFX N01 ь быҙ/O16 [ь]	+Pred1Pl
SFX N01 0 һығыҙ/O16 [^ь]	+Pred2Pl
SFX N01 ь һығыҙ/O16 [ь]	+Pred2Pl
SFX N01 0 ым/O21 [^ь]	+PxSg1
SFX N01 ь ым/O21 [ь]	+PxSg1
SFX N01 0 ың/O21 [^ь]	+PxSg2
SFX N01 ь ың/O21 [ь]	+PxSg2
SFX N01 0 ы/O29 [^ь]	+PxSg3
SFX N01 ь ы/O29 [ь]	+PxSg3
SFX N01 0 ыбыҙ/O25 [^ь]	+PxPl1
SFX N01 ь ыбыҙ/O25 [ь]	+PxPl1
SFX N01 0 ығыҙ/O25 [^ь]	+PxPl2
SFX N01 ь ығыҙ/O25 [ь]	+PxPl2
SFX N01 0 мы/O33 [^ь]	+Q
SFX N01 ь мы/O33 [ь]	+Q
SFX N01 0 дыр [^ь]	+Indf
SFX N01 ь дыр [ь]	+Indf
SFX N01 0 сы [^ь]	+Clt/сы
SFX N01 ь сы [ь]	+Clt/сы
SFX N01 0 дыҡы/O38 [^ь]	+Poss
SFX N01 ь дыҡы/O38 [ь]	+Poss
SFX N01 0 ҡай/O42 [^ь]	+Dim
SFX N01 ь ҡай/O42 [ь]	+Dim
SFX N01 0 дай/O44 [^ь]	+Der/дай
SFX N01 ь дай/O44 [ь]	+Der/дай
SFX N01 0 са/O46 [^ь]	+Der/са
SFX N01 ь са/O46 [ь]	+Der/са
SFX N01 0 дағы/O48 [^ь]	+Der/дағы
SFX N01 ь дағы/O48 [ь]	+Der/дағы
SFX N01 0 лы/O50 [^ь]	+Der/лы
SFX N01 ь лы/O50 [ь]	+Der/лы
SFX N01 0 һыҙ/O54 [^ь]	+Abe
SFX N01 ь һыҙ/O54 [ь]	+Abe
SFX N01 0 ғаса/O58 [^ь]	+Der/ҡаса
SFX N01 ь ғаса/O58 [ь]	+Der/ҡаса
